Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-103.01
Court of Appeals; review by Supreme Court; docket fee.

At the time of filing a petition for further review to the Supreme Court from the Court of Appeals, there shall be paid to the clerk the sum of fifty dollars as a docket fee in lieu of any other filing fees. The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges.

Laws 2005, LB 348, § 6.